South Dakota, session 2026, HB1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $6,800,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Social Services, to increase the benefit amounts for the temporary assistance for needy
families program. Beginning on the effective date of this Act, the department shall provide
benefit amounts equal to those provided during fiscal year 2025, until July 1, 2027.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Social Services shall approve vouchers and
the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 4. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.